Florida, session 2026, SB1426.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 112.537, Florida Statutes, is created 15 and incorporated into part VI of chapter 112, Florida Statutes, 16 to read: 17 112.537âAccess to public records.â 18 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âemploying agencyâ 19 has the same meaning as in s. 943.10(4). 20 (2)âThe employing agency of a law enforcement officer which 21 furnishes the personnel file or other public record of such 22 officer shall maintain in such file or record a log documenting 23 the name, address, and type of identification presented, if any, 24 of any person who requests and receives the personnel file or 25 other public record. 26 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.